Washington statutes.
RCW 43.22.460

Factory built housing and commercial structures, regulating installation of—Certain requirements reserved to local jurisdictions.

Local land use requirements, building setbacks, side and rear yard requirements, site development and property line requirements, and review and regulation of zoning requirements are specifically reserved to local jurisdictions notwithstanding anything contained in RCW 43.22.450 through 43.22.490.

[ 1970 ex.s. c 44 s 3.]